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DTC P0325/52 Knock Sensor 1 CircuitMalfunction

DTC P0330/55 Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Knock sensors are fitted one to the right bank and left bank of the cylinder block to detect engine knocking.
This sensor contains a piezoelectric element which generates a voltage when it becomes deformed, which
occurs when the cylinder block vibrates due to knocking. If engine knocking occurs, ignition timing is retarded
to suppress it.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0325/52
No knock sensor 1 signal to engine ECU with engine speed
between 1,700 rpm and 5,400 rpm

SOpenorshort inknocksensor1circuit
SKnocksensor1 (looseness)
SEngineECU

P0330/55
No knock sensor 2 signal to engine ECU with engine speed
between 1,700 rpm and 5,400 rpm

SOpenorshort inknocksensor2circuit
SKnocksensor2 (looseness)
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S DTCP0325/52 is for the leftbankknocksensorcircuit.
S DTCP0330/55 is for the rightbankknocksensorcircuit.
S Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the time
of the malfunction.

Whenusinghand −held tester

1 Connecthand −held testerandcheckknocksensorcircuit.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b) Disconnect the wire to wire connector EC1.
(c) Connect the terminals of the disconnected EC1 male con-

nector and EC1 female as follows.

Maleconnector � Femaleconnector

Terminal1 � Terminal2

Terminal2 � Terminal1

(d)Turn ignitionswitchONandswitch thehand −held tester
main switch ON.

(e) After the engine is warmed up, perform quick racing to
4,000 rpm three times.

CHECK:
Check the DTC.
RESULT:

Type I
DTC same as when vehicle brought in.

P0325/52 � P0325/52orP0330/55 � P0330/55

Type II
DTC different to when vehicle brought in.

P0325/52 � P0330/55orP0330/55 � P0325/52



A00068

KNK signal waveform

0.5V
Division

0.5V/
Division

0 V

0 V

5 m sec./Division

0.2 m sec./Division

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−69

2UZ−FE ENGINE (RM630E)

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
S With the engine racing (4,000 rpm) measure between ter-

minal KNK1, KNK2 of the engine ECU connector and
body ground.

HINT:
The correct waveforms are as shown.

S Spread the time on the horizontal axis, and confirm that
period of the wave is 0.13 m sec.
(Normal mode vibration frequency of knock sensor:
8.1 kHz)

HINT:
If normal mode vibration frequency is not 8.1 kHz, the sensor
is malfunctioning.

Type II Go to step 3.

Type I

2Checkforopenandshort inharnessandconnectorbetweenEC 1 connectorand
engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between EC1 connector and
knock sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

HINT:
S IfDTCP0325/52haschanged toP0330/55,check theknocksensorcircuit on the leftbankside.
S IfDTCP0330/55haschanged toP0325/52,check theknocksensorcircuit on the rightbankside.

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace knock sensor.

Whennotusinghand −held tester

1 CheckcontinuitybetweenterminalKNKR,KNKLofengineECUconnectorand
body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E7 connector of engine ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal KNKR, KNKL of engine
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orhigher

OK Go to step 3.

NG



FI6630

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−71

2UZ−FE ENGINE (RM630E)

2 Check knock sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect knock sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between the knock sensor terminal and
body.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Replace knock sensor.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
knock sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Does malfunction disappear when a good knock sensor is installed?

YES Replace knock sensor.

NO

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


